Utah statutes.
10-6-153.   Municipal government fiscal committee created -- Members -- Terms -- Vacancies -- Recommendations.

(1)  There is hereby created a municipal government fiscal committee, the members of which shall be:

(a)  all auditors of cities of the first class and two auditors from cities of the second class  appointed by the state auditor;

(b)  four elected or appointed municipal officials, two of whom shall be from larger cities of the third class, one of whom shall be from cities of the fourth class, and one of whom shall be from cities of the fifth class, appointed by the state auditor from a list recommended by the Utah League of Cities and Towns; and

(c)  two additional members who are knowledgeable in the area of municipal fiscal affairs appointed by the state auditor.

(2) (a)  Members shall be appointed to four-year terms on the committee, provided that the term of an elected or appointed official shall terminate upon ceasing to be an elected official or an employee of the city for which such person worked when appointed.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (2)(a), the auditor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of committee members are staggered so that approximately half of the committee is appointed every two years.

(3)  Any vacancy shall be filled by the state auditor from the same class as the original appointment as described in Subsection (1).  Members may be reappointed.

(4)  The advisory committee shall assist, advise, and make recommendations to the state auditor in the preparation of uniform accounting and reporting procedures and program and performance accounting, budgeting, and reporting for cities.

(5)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.



Amended by Chapter 286, 2010 General Session

